New Jersey, session 222, A400.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services shall reopen all programs providing functional services to persons with developmental disabilities that ceased operations as a result of the Public Health Emergency declared by the Governor in Executive Order No. 103 of 2020 in the same manner and subject to the same procedures as those requiring schools to re-open and provide full-day, in-person instruction, including but not limited to, adherence to all appropriate health and safety standards delineated in Executive Order No. 175 of 2020. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.